Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.120

License—Temporary certificates, restrictions.

Any person who shall make application for examination, as provided by RCW 18.92.070, and who has not previously failed to pass the veterinary examination, and whose application is found satisfactory by the secretary, may be given a temporary certificate to practice veterinary medicine, surgery and dentistry valid only until the results of the next examination for licenses are available. In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW. No more than one temporary certificate may be issued to any applicant. Such permittee shall be employed by a licensed veterinary practitioner or by the state of Washington.

[ 1991 c 3 s 245; 1986 c 259 s 142; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 8; 1959 c 92 s 9; 1941 c 71 s 11; 1907 c 124 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.